Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,106.03
Rehabilitative
services; hearing; court order; use.

Any time
after the disposition of a juvenile described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b),
or (4) of section 43-247, upon the motion of any party or the court on its
own motion, a hearing may be held regarding the amenability of the juvenile
to the rehabilitative services that can be provided under the Nebraska Juvenile
Code. The court may enter an order, based upon evidence presented at the hearing,
finding that a juvenile is not amenable to rehabilitative services that can
be provided under the Nebraska Juvenile Code. The reasons for such a finding
shall be stated in the order. Such an order shall be considered by the county
attorney in making a future determination under section 43-276 regarding such
juvenile and by the court when considering a future transfer motion under
section 29-1816 or 43-274 or
any future charge or petition regarding such juvenile.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 41;

Laws 2014, LB464, § 24.